District of Columbia statutes.
10-615

Purposes for which advancements may be used.

The sum authorized by § 10-614, or any part thereof shall, when advanced, be available to the Mayor of the District of Columbia for the preparation of plans, designs, estimates, models, and specifications; and for architectural and other necessary professional services required for carrying out the provisions of §§ 10-614 to 10-618; and for the construction of a Recorder of Deeds building, including materials and labor, heating, lighting, elevators, plumbing, landscaping, transportation or rental thereof, and all other appurtenances, and the purchase and installation of machinery, furniture, equipment, apparatus, and any and all other expenditures necessary for or incident to the complete construction and equipment for use of the aforesaid building and plant.

July 11, 1940, 54 Stat. 757, ch. 583, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 9-215.
1973 Ed., § 9-216.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government